Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5837
Certificate of need application; filing; fee.

An application for a certificate of need shall be filed with the department. All applications for a certificate of need shall be accompanied by a one-thousand-dollar nonrefundable fee. Such fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the General Fund.

Laws 1979, LB 172, § 37;

Laws 1982, LB 378, § 28;

Laws 1989, LB 429, § 24;

Laws 1993, LB 840, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 28.